Utah statutes.
16-16-901.   Indemnification.

(1)  Indemnification of an individual who has incurred liability or is a party, or is threatened to be made a party, to litigation because of the performance of a duty to, or activity on behalf of, a limited cooperative association is governed by Title 3, Uniform Agricultural Cooperative Association Act.

(2)  A limited cooperative association may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any individual against liability asserted against or incurred by the individual to the same extent and subject to the same conditions as provided by Title 3, Uniform Agricultural Cooperative Association Act.

